Washington statutes.
RCW 36.24.010

To act as sheriff under certain conditions.

The coroner shall perform the duties of the sheriff in all cases where the sheriff is interested or otherwise incapacitated from serving; and whenever the coroner acts as sheriff he or she shall possess the powers and perform all the duties of sheriff, and shall be liable on his or her official bond in like manner as the sheriff would be, and shall be entitled to the same fees as are allowed by law to the sheriff for similar services: PROVIDED, That nothing herein contained shall prevent the court from appointing a suitable person to discharge such duties, as provided by RCW 36.28.090.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4031; 1963 c 4 s 36.24.010. Prior: 1897 c 21 s 1; Code 1881 s 2776; 1863 p 559 s 2; 1854 p 436 s 2; RRS s 4180.]